Nebraska, session 109, LB627.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB627 LB627
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska
is hereby authorized to design and construct residential facilities for
students in nursing and allied health professions in Norfolk, Nebraska.
The total project cost to be supported from state funds is $23,000,000.
It is the intent of the Legislature to provide annual appropriations for
this purpose in the amount of $1,150,000 for twenty years.
(2) The Board of Regents may enter into long-term financing
contracts with any person, firm, or corporation for the project. The
payments of the costs of the project may occur over a contract period not
to extend beyond June 30, 2045. The Board of Regents shall not pledge the
credit of the State of Nebraska for the payment of any sum owing on
account of such contracts, except that there may be pledged for payment
of any such contracts any appropriations made by the Legislature for such
purpose. The Board of Regents may also convey, lease, or lease back all
or any part of the university facilities and the land on which any such
facility is situated to such person, firm, or corporation as the Board of
Regents may contract with pursuant to this section to facilitate the
long-term payment of the cost of the facilities. Any such conveyance or
lease shall provide that when the cost of the facility has been paid,
together with interest and other costs thereon, the facility and the land
on which such facility is located shall become the property of the Board
of Regents. No contracts shall be entered into pursuant to this section
without prior approval by resolution of the Board of Regents. The Board
of Regents may schedule contractual payments on a monthly, quarterly, or
semiannual basis consistent with the state fiscal year. On or before
August 31, 2045, any funds appropriated from the Nebraska Capital
Construction Fund and the General Fund for the project held in the state
treasury and held by any trustee which are not necessary to meet the
terms of any long-term financing agreements entered into pursuant to this
section shall be transferred to the General Fund.
(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriations for
-2-

LB627 LB627
2025 2025
the facilities described in this section shall not be reduced until all
contracts and securities relating to the construction and financing of
the facilities are completed or paid but in no case shall such
appropriations extend beyond the fiscal year ending June 30, 2045.
(4) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate $250,000 to
the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska for educational
technology for facilities being used for education by the University of
Nebraska in Norfolk, Nebraska.
-3-